Utah statutes.
58-37c-9.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  Each license issued under this chapter shall be issued in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.  A renewal period may be extended or shortened by as much as one year to maintain established renewal cycles or to change an established renewal cycle.

(2)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless renewed by the licensee in accordance with Section 58-1-308.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 297, 1993 General Session

